Washington statutes.
RCW 4.20.050

Action not abated by death or disability if it survives—Substitution.

No action shall abate by the death, marriage, or other disability of the party, or by the transfer of any interest therein, if the cause of action survives or continues; but the court may at any time within one year thereafter, on motion, allow the action to be continued by or against his or her representatives or successors in interest.

[ 2011 c 336 s 91; Code 1881 s 17; 1877 p 6 s 17; 1869 p 6 s 17; 1854 p 132 s 11; RRS s 193.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 3.2, 18.22.